Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-1915
Permit fees; inspection; provisions applicable.

The State of Nebraska shall permit cities and villages to collect permit fees and inspect all sanitary plumbing installed or repaired, except for a single-family dwelling or a farm or ranch structure, within the State of Nebraska outside of the zoning jurisdiction of cities and villages. The city or village nearest the construction site shall have jurisdiction to collect such permit fees and conduct the inspection of the sanitary plumbing. If the city or village has a plumbing ordinance in force and effect, such ordinance will govern the installation of the sanitary plumbing. If there is no city ordinance in effect for such city or village, the American National Standards Institute Uniform Plumbing Code, ANSI A40-1993, shall apply to all buildings except single-family dwellings and farm and ranch structures.

Any code or ordinance enacted by a city or village which is at least equal to the American National Standards Institute Uniform Plumbing Code, ANSI A40-1993, shall take preference over the provisions of the immediately preceding sentence.

Laws 1969, c. 100, § 1, p. 474;

Laws 1996, LB 1304, § 2.